District of Columbia statutes.
1-631.04

Rules and regulations affecting disclosure.

The Mayor shall issue rules and regulations governing the disclosure of official information contained in personnel records.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3104, 25 DCR 5740

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-632.4.
1973 Ed., § 1-361.4.